da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Løbehjul > Elløbehjul: Elløbehjul til pendling; Elløbehjul til offroad; Elløbehjul med høj ydeevne; Elløbehjul til teenagere
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Roller > E-Scooter: Pendler-E-Scooter; Geländegängige E-Scooter; Leistungsstarke E-Scooter; E-Scooter für Kinder
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Riding Scooters > E-Scooters: Commuter E-Scooters; Off-Road E-Scooters; Performance E-Scooters; Youth E-Scooters
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Катание на самокатах > Электросамокаты: Электросамокаты для поездок на работу; Внедорожные электросамокаты; Высокопроизводительные электросамокаты; Электросамокаты для молодежи
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Patinetes > Patinetes eléctricos: Patinetes eléctricos de uso cotidiano; Patinetes eléctricos todoterreno; Patinetes eléctricos de alto rendimiento; Patinetes eléctricos para jóvenes
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Scooters > Scooters eletrónicas: Scooters elétricas para trajetos diários; Scooters elétricas off-road; Scooters elétricas de alto desempenho; Trotinetes infantis
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Sparkesykler > El-sparkesykler: El-scootere for pendlere; El-scootere for terrengkjøring; Kraftige el-scootere; El-scootere for barn og ungdom
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Paspirtukai > Elektriniai paspirtukai: Priemiestiniai elektriniai paspirtukai; Bekelių elektriniai paspirtukai; Pasirodymų elektriniai paspirtukai; Elektriniai paspirtukai jaunimui
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Scutere pentru grădinărit > Trotinete electrice: Trotinete electrice pentru navetă; Trotinete electrice off-road; Trotinete electrice de performanță; Trotinete electrice pentru tineret
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 씽씽이 > 전기 킥보드: 통근용 전기 스쿠터; 오프로드 전기 스쿠터; 성능형 전기 스쿠터; 청소년용 전기 스쿠터
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > キックスクーター > 電動スクーター: 通勤用電動スクーター; オフロード電動スクーター; パフォーマンス電動スクーター; 若者向け電動スクーター
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Motonetas > E-scooters: Patinetes elétricos para transporte urbano; Patinetes elétricos off-road; Patinetes elétricos de performance; Patinetes elétricos juvenis
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Skiroji > E-skiroji: E-skiroji za dnevno vožnjo; E-skiroji za vožnjo po terenu; Visokozmogljivi e-skiroji; E-skiroji za otroke
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Scooterrijden > E-scooters: Stads-E-scooters; Offroad E-scooters; Prestatie E-scooters; Jeugd E-scooters
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Hulajnogi > Hulajnogi elektryczne: Elektryczne hulajnogi miejskie; Elektryczne hulajnogi terenowe; Elektryczne hulajnogi wyczynowe; Elektryczne hulajnogi młodzieżowe
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Scooter Motorlar > E-Scooterlar: Commuter E-Scooter'lar; Off-Road E-Scooter'lar; Performans E-Scooter'ları; Gençler İçin E-Scooter'lar
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Romobili za vožnju > Električni romobili: Električni romobili za prigradsku vožnju; Terenski električni romobili; Električni romobili visokih performansi; Električni romobili za mlade
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Koloběžky a skútry > Elektroskútry: Příměstské elektroskútry; Terénní elektroskútry; Výkonné elektroskútry; Elektroskútry pro mladé
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Μοτοποδήλατα (Riding Scooters) > Ηλεκτρικά πατίνια: Ηλεκτρονικά πατίνια για μετακίνηση; Ηλεκτρονικά πατίνια εκτός δρόμου; Ηλεκτρονικά πατίνια απόδοσης; Ηλεκτρονικά πατίνια για νέους
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Motoros rollerek > Elektromos rollerek: Ingázó elektromos rollerek; Terepjáró elektromos rollerek; Nagy teljesítményű elektromos rollerek; Elektromos rollerek fiataloknak
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Каране на тротинетки > Електрически тротинетки: Електрически тротинетки за ежедневно пътуване; Офроуд електрически тротинетки; Високоефективни електрически тротинетки; Младежки електрически тротинетки
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > สกูทเตอร์สำหรับขับขี่ > สกูทเตอร์ไฟฟ้า: สกู๊ตเตอร์ไฟฟ้าสำหรับเดินทาง; สกู๊ตเตอร์ไฟฟ้าออฟโรด; สกู๊ตเตอร์ไฟฟ้าประสิทธิภาพสูง; สกู๊ตเตอร์ไฟฟ้าสำหรับวัยรุ่น
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Kolobežky > E-kolobežky: E-kolobežky na dochádzanie; Terénne E-kolobežky; Výkonné E-kolobežky; E-kolobežky pre mládež
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Scooter > Scooter elettrici: Scooter elettrici per pendolari; Scooter elettrici fuoristrada; Scooter elettrici ad alte prestazioni; Scooter elettrici per giovani
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 滑板车 > 电动滑板车: 通勤电动滑板车; 越野电动滑板车; 高性能电动滑板车; 青少年电动滑板车
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Xe trượt scooter đạp chân > Xe tay ga điện tử: Xe máy điện đi làm; Xe máy điện địa hình; Xe máy điện hiệu suất cao; Xe máy điện trẻ em
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Potkulaudat > Sähköpotkulaudat: Lähiliikenteen sähköpotkulaudat; Maastosähköpotkulaudat; Suorituskykyiset sähköpotkulaudat; Nuorten sähköpotkulaudat
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 滑板車 > 電動滑板車: 通勤電動滑板車; 越野電動滑板車; 高性能電動滑板車; 青少年電動滑板車
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Skotrar > E-skotrar: Pendlar-E-skoter; Off-road E-skoter; Prestanda E-skotrar; Ungdoms-E-skotrar
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Trottinettes > Trottinettes électriques: Trottinettes électriques pour les déplacements quotidiens; Trottinettes électriques tout-terrain; Trottinettes électriques performantes; Trottinettes pour jeunes